New Jersey, session 221, S3120.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.2013, c.204 (C.55:13C-2.2) is amended to read as follows: 2.    a.  Except as provided in subsection b. of this section, an emergency shelter for the homeless shall not refuse to provide shelter, or food and shelter, for a minimum of 72 hours, to an individual or family seeking these services, unless the shelter is at its licensed capacity or the basis for refusal is otherwise authorized by law or regulation. b.    In the event of an emergency condition, an emergency shelter for the homeless, which has been authorized by a public officer of a municipality or the Department of Community Affairs to provide shelter, or food and shelter, to a specified number of individuals in excess of its licensed capacity because of emergency conditions, shall not refuse to provide shelter, or food and shelter, for a minimum of 24 hours from the commencement of the emergency condition or for the duration of the emergency condition, whichever is longer, to an individual or family seeking these services, unless the shelter is at its licensed capacity plus any authorized excess capacity or the basis for refusal is otherwise authorized by law or regulation. c.     (1)  Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, an emergency shelter for the homeless shall not require an individual seeking shelter to be enrolled in a local, State, federal, or private assistance program, or to be receiving any other services or benefits as a condition of receiving shelter for a minimum of 72 hours, in accordance with subsection a. of this section. (2)   Following the initial 72 hours, an emergency shelter for the homeless may require an individual to commence the application process for programs, assistance, or other services or benefits, as a condition of continued provision of shelter.  An individual in compliance with this requirement shall be provided with shelter for a period of no less than 90 days. (3)   Nothing in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection shall require an emergency shelter for the homeless to exceed its licensed capacity, plus any authorized excess capacity, or prohibit an emergency shelter for the homeless from refusing to provide shelter if the refusal is otherwise authorized by law or regulation. (cf: P.L.2013, c.204, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.